Utah statutes.
9-6-606.   Office limitations.
The office may not:
(1)  collect, manage, borrow, or purchase artifacts, objects, or other items
for its own collection;
(2)  operate its own exhibit or display area; or
(3)  direct any action to be taken or make any mandatory policies to be
followed by an individual museum or its parent agency.
